Utah statutes.
9-7-303.   Withdrawing books.

(1)  Books may be taken from the State Law Library by:

(a)  the members, officers, and staff of the Legislature;

(b)  the officers and staff of the executive departments and of the several boards and commissions of the state government; and

(c)  the justices of the Supreme Court, the judges of other state courts, and their staffs.

(2)  No other person may withdraw any book from the State Law Library.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

